Massachusetts, session 194th, H1088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34M of Chapter 90 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended in line 82 by inserting after the word “protection” the following:
Whether in whole or in part,
SECTION 2. Section 34M of Chapter 90 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended in line 94 by inserting after the word “fees” the following:
except the court shall not assess attorney’s fees or costs if, within thirty days of service of
the summons and complaint, the insurer tenders to the Plaintiff the amount due and payable.
of 1